Louisiana, session 2026, SB241.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1674.1(A)(22), 1706(H)(12), and 1807.16(D)(5) are hereby
enacted to read as follows:
§1674.1. Standards of conduct; acknowledgment required
A. The following standards of conduct shall be binding on all claims
adjusters:
* * *
(22) An adjuster shall include his Louisiana license number in all
electronic communications to the insured other than text messages composed
and sent as part of his business or employment.
* * *
§1706. Standards of conduct of public adjuster
* * *
H. Public adjusters shall also adhere to all of the following general
requirements:
* * *
(12) A public adjuster shall include his Louisiana license number in all
electronic communications to the insured other than text messages composed
and sent as part of his business or employment.
* * *
§1807.16. Appraiser obligations
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 241 ENROLLED
* * *
D. An appraiser has a duty to do all of the following:
* * *
(5) Include his Louisiana license number in all electronic
communications to the insured other than text messages composed and sent as
part of his business or employment.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.